Missouri, session 2026, SB1793.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 571.095, RSMo, is repealed and three
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
143.178, 571.068, and 571.095, to read as follows:
143.178. 1. For the purposes of this section, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Continuous service", continuous years of service
at the same department, unit, or other comparable
organization;
(2) "First responder", any governmental employee
working or volunteering as a commissioned law enforcement
officer, dispatcher, state-licensed emergency medical
technician, state-licensed paramedic, or firefighter
certified at minimum as state firefighter I.
2. (1) For all tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2027, for the purposes of calculating the
Missouri taxable income as required under section 143.011, a
percentage of the income received by any person as salary or
compensation in any form as a first responder, to the extent
that such income is included in the federal adjusted gross
income, may be deducted from the taxpayer's Missouri

SB 1793 2
adjusted gross income to determine such taxpayer's Missouri
taxable income.
(2) Such income shall be deducted as follows:
(a) For first responders with at least two, but fewer
than four years of continuous service, ten percent of such
income;
(b) For first responders with at least four, but fewer
than six years of continuous service, twenty percent of such
income;
(c) For first responders with at least six, but fewer
than eight years of continuous service, thirty percent of
such income;
(d) For first responders with at least eight, but
fewer than ten years of continuous service, forty percent of
such income;
(e) For first responders with ten or more years of
continuous service, fifty percent of such income.
571.068. 1. A person who is less than eighteen years
of age commits the offense of unlawful possession of a
firearm by a minor if such person knowingly possesses a
handgun or ammunition that is only suitable for a handgun.
2. The offense of unlawful possession of a firearm by
a minor is a class A misdemeanor.
3. This offense shall not apply to:
(1) A temporary transfer of a handgun or ammunition to
a person under the age of eighteen or the possession or use
of a handgun or ammunition by a person under the age of
eighteen if the handgun and ammunition are possessed and
used by such person in accordance with state law and any
ordinances of a political subdivision:
(a) In the course of employment;

SB 1793 3
(b) In the course of ranching or farming related to
activities at the residence of the person or on property
used for ranching or farming at which the person, with the
permission of the property owner or lessee, is performing
activities related to the operation of the farm or ranch; or
(c) In the course of target practice, hunting, or
during instruction in the safe and lawful use of a handgun.
The person under the age of eighteen shall have the prior
written consent of the person's parent or guardian who is
not prohibited by federal or state law or any ordinance from
processing a firearm and shall transport the handgun
unloaded and in a locked container directly from the place
of transfer to the place at which the activity in this
subdivision is to take place;
(2) A person under the age of eighteen who is a member
of the Armed Forces of the United States or the National
Guard who possesses or is armed with a handgun in the line
of duty;
(3) A transfer by inheritance of title of a handgun or
ammunition to a person under the age of eighteen; or
(4) The possession of a handgun or ammunition by a
person under the age of eighteen taken in defense of the
person or other persons against an intruder into the
residence of the person or a residence in which the person
is invited as a guest.
4. As used in this section, "handgun" shall mean a
firearm which has a short stock and is designed to be held
and fired by the use of a single hand, and shall not include
an antique firearm as defined in section 571.010.
571.095. 1. Upon conviction for or attempting to
commit a felony in violation of any law perpetrated in whole

SB 1793 4
or in part by the use of a firearm, the court may, in
addition to the penalty provided by law for such offense,
order the confiscation and disposal or sale or trade to a
licensed firearms dealer of firearms and ammunition used in
the commission of the crime or found in the possession or
under the immediate control of the defendant at the time of
his or her arrest.
2. A firearm or ammunition which is in the possession
of a minor in violation of section 571.068, the possession
of which is transferred to the minor in circumstances in
which the transferor is not in violation of section 571.060
or section 571.080, shall not be subject to permanent
confiscation if its possession by the minor subsequently
becomes unlawful because of the conduct of the minor, but
shall be returned to the lawful owner when such firearm is
no longer required for the purposes of investigation or
prosecution.
3. The proceeds of any sale or gains from trade shall
be the property of the police department or sheriff's
department responsible for the defendant's arrest or the
confiscation of the firearms and ammunition. If such
firearms or ammunition are not the property of the convicted
felon, they shall be returned to their rightful owner if he
or she is known and was not a participant in the crime. Any
proceeds collected under this section shall be deposited
with the municipality or by the county treasurer into the
county sheriff's revolving fund established in section
50.535.
✓